Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,203
Actions against state; summons; venue.

When action is brought under section 25-21,201, summons shall be served upon the state in the manner provided for service of a summons in section 25-510.02. An action brought under subdivision (4) of section 25-21,201 may be brought in Lancaster County, Nebraska, or in any county in which the drainage district, irrigation district, municipal corporation, or other political or governmental subdivision whose bonds or other obligations are involved is situated either in whole or in part.

Laws 1877, § 3, p. 20;

R.S.1913, § 1179;

C.S.1922, § 1102;

C.S.1929, § 27-321;

Laws 1937, c. 61, § 2, p. 240;

Laws 1941, c. 49, § 2, p. 240;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-321;

R.S.1943, § 24-321;

Laws 1963, c. 130, § 1, p. 497;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-321;

Laws 1997, LB 165, § 2.

Suit brought against State Engineer by name was not sufficient to make the state a party to the action. Rumbel v. Ress, 166 Neb. 839, 91 N.W.2d 36 (1958).

Board of Educational Lands and Funds served with process in accordance with this section. County of Garden v. Schaaf, 145 Neb. 676, 17 N.W.2d 874 (1945).